Utah statutes.
9-9-406.   Savings provision.
Nothing in this part may be construed to:
(1)  limit the authority of a state agency to:
(a)  return or repatriate Native American remains to Indian tribes or
individuals; or
(b)  enter into another agreement with the consent of the lineal descendant or
culturally affiliated tribe as to the disposition or control over Native
American remains;
(2)  delay actions on repatriation requests that are pending on March 17,
1992;
(3)  deny or otherwise affect access to any court, except as provided in
Subsection 9-9-403(6);
(4)  limit any procedural or substantive rights that may otherwise be secured
to individuals or Indian tribes; or
(5)  limit the application of any state or federal law pertaining to theft or
stolen property.
